District of Columbia statutes.
50-211.04

Program goals.

(a)

The Director, in coordination with the District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) and other agencies, shall balance the following goals in performing the Director’s responsibilities:

(1)

Providing vehicles that meet the mission of the client agency;

(2)

Enhancing the overall cost and energy efficiency of the District government’s vehicle fleet;

(3)

Reducing the total number of passenger vehicles in the standing fleet and reduce their use;

(4)

Encouraging transit use and multimodal transportation;

(5)

Promoting the use of Bikeshare for work-related travel;

(6)

Promoting the use of taxicabs for trips where the cost of a taxi would be less than the cost of using a government vehicle;

(7)

Ensuring timely reimbursement for work-related transportation expenses incurred by employees;

(8)

Reducing total fuel use, improving fleet fuel economy, and promoting the use of alternative fuels;

(9)

Diversifying the range of fuels used for transportation within the District;

(10)

Using the District’s purchasing power to facilitate the availability of alternative fuels for use in private fleets and personal vehicles;

(11)

Meeting or exceeding the requirements of section 507 of the Energy Policy Act of 1992, approved October 24, 1992 (106 Stat. 2891; 42 U.S.C. § 13257) and associated regulations; and

(12)

When vehicle acquisition is necessary, acquiring a vehicle with the lowest real cost of ownership.

(b)

Factors to consider in determining the real cost of ownership for the purpose of subsection (a)(12) of this section shall include:

(1)

The sales price of vehicle;

(2)

The projected vehicle life;

(3)

The projected fuel costs;

(4)

The projected operation costs;

(5)

The projected maintenance costs; and

(6)

The vehicle emissions.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-223, § 104, 59 DCR 13537
This section is referenced in § 50-211.02.
Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided that §§ 101, 102, 104, 105(a), 105(b), 106, 107, 201(a), 201(b), 201(c), 202, 203, and 301 of the act shall apply as of Mar. 5, 2013.